Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1484.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4561(a) of Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 4561. Compensation of and travel allowance for jurors.(a) Compensation.--A person summoned to serve as a juror shall receive compensation at the rate of [$9 a day for the first three days in any calendar year he shall be required to report for service and $25 a day for each day thereafter in such calendar year] $40 a day for each day that such person is required to report. In addition, persons so summoned shall be paid a travel allowance at the rate of 17¢ per mile circular 1234567891011121314151617 except that no travel allowance shall be paid in the first judicial district.(a.1) Method of compensation.--The county commissioners in each county shall select the method by which jurors are compensated under subsection (a), which may include a check, debit card, bank transfer or other method selected by the county commissioners. The method of compensation may not affect the amount of compensation.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1484PN1738 - 2 - 12345678910